New Jersey, session 221, A3059.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 8 of P.L.2021, c.197 (C.52:27H-79.1) is amended to read as follows: 8. a. Receipts from [the first $100,000 of] retail sales of materials, supplies, and services for the exclusive use of erecting structures or buildings on, or improving, altering, or repairing the real property of a qualified business, or a contractor hired by the qualified business to make such improvements, alterations, or repairs, are exempt from the taxes imposed under the "Sales and Use Tax Act," P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.); provided, however, receipts from retail sales of materials, supplies, and services for the exclusive use of erecting new structures or buildings on, or substantially improving, altering, or repairing the real property of a qualified business shall be eligible for such tax exemption notwithstanding the limit imposed pursuant to this subsection. b. As used in this section: "Qualified business" includes a person who is certified as a qualified business by the authority and provided a UZ-4 certification by the authority.  A person who is certified as a qualified business may apply to the authority for a UZ-4 certification provided that the person owns or leases and regularly operates a place of business located in an eligible block group, as defined in subsection a. of section 12 of P.L.2021, c.197 (C.52:27H-99).  The Department of the Treasury shall provide to a qualified business a certificate evidencing its UZ-4 certification, which certificate shall indicate the location at which the sales tax exemption provided for in this section is available. "Substantially improving, altering, or repairing" means any reconstruction, rehabilitation, addition, or other improvement to a structure, of which the total cost equals to or exceeds 50 percent of the market value of the structure before the start of construction of the improvement.  The UEZ Authority may, from time to time, alter this definition through regulation to respond to changing market conditions. (cf: P.L.2021, c.197, s.8) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply retroactively to sales and uses on and after January 1, 2022.